Wisconsin, session 2025, AB821.
do enact as follows:AB821,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB821,29Section 2. 20.455 (5) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:AB821,2,121020.455 (5) (dm) Grants for recruiting and retaining health care providers to 11conduct examinations. Biennially, the amounts in the schedule to provide grants to 12health care facilities under s. 165.934 and to administer the grant program.AB821,313Section 3. 165.934 of the statutes is created to read:AB821,2,1614165.934 Grants to health care facilities to conduct examinations of 15victims. (1) Definition. In this section, “department” means the department of 16justice.AB821,3,21(2) Grants. The department shall provide grants to health care facilities 2that are eligible under sub. (3).AB821,3,43(3) Grant eligibility. A health care facility is eligible to apply for and 4receive a grant under this section if the facility meets all of the following criteria:AB821,3,95(a) The health care facility creates a new position for a health care provider 6who conducts, or creates a recruitment program, a retention program, or a training 7program for health care providers who conduct, examinations described under s. 8949.20 (3) for offenses that involve an allegation of domestic abuse or that involve 9strangulation.AB821,3,1210(b) The health care facility provides that it will maintain any position or 11program created with the grant moneys for a period determined by the department 12after the grant funding ends.AB821,3,1713(4) Goals. When providing grants under this section, the department shall 14attempt to provide funding to recruit or retain a number of health care providers 15who conduct examinations described under s. 949.20 (3) in each county that is one 16more than the number of such health care providers that the county has on the 17effective date of this subsection .... (LRB inserts date).AB821,418Section 4. Subchapter II (title) of chapter 949 [precedes 949.20] of the 19statutes is amended to read:AB821,3,2020CHAPTER 949AB821,3,2321SUBCHAPTER II22SEXUAL ASSAULT FORENSIC 23EXAMINATION COMPENSATIONAB821,51Section 5. 949.20 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB821,4,42949.20 (1) “Cooperate with a law enforcement agency” means to report a sex 3an offense to a law enforcement agency or to aid a law enforcement agency in the 4investigation of a sex an offense.AB821,65Section 6. 949.20 (2L) of the statutes is created to read:AB821,4,76949.20 (2L) “Domestic abuse” has the meaning given in s. 813.12 (1) (am) 1. or 72.AB821,78Section 7. 949.20 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB821,4,169949.20 (3) “Examination costs” means the costs of an examination that is done 10to gather evidence regarding a sex offense and, if the offense involved is a sex 11offense, any procedure during that examination process that tests for or prevents a 12sexually transmitted disease, and any medication provided or prescribed, during 13that related to the examination process, that prevents or treats a sexually 14transmitted disease that the person performing the examination or procedure 15believes could be a consequence of the sex offense. “Examination costs” does not 16include any processing or administrative costs, attorney fees, or other expenses.AB821,817Section 8. 949.20 (3d) of the statutes is created to read:AB821,4,2018949.20 (3d) “Examination to gather evidence” means an examination that is 19done on a victim to gather evidence regarding a sex offense, an offense that involves 20an allegation of domestic abuse, or an offense that involves strangulation.AB821,921Section 9. 949.20 (9) of the statutes is amended to read:AB821,5,222949.20 (9) “Victim” means a person against whom a sex offense, an offense 1that involves an allegation of domestic abuse, or an offense that involves 2strangulation has been committed.AB821,103Section 10. 949.24 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB821,5,64949.24 (1) Eligibility. Any health care provider who conducts an 5examination to gather evidence regarding a sex offense may apply for an award 6under this subchapter.AB821,117Section 11. 949.24 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB821,5,158949.24 (3) Medical records. An applicant shall submit to the department 9reports from any physician, physician’s assistant, or nurse who treated or examined 10the victim to gather evidence regarding a sex offense, performed any procedure 11during that treatment or examination that tests for or prevents a sexually 12transmitted disease, or provided or prescribed any medication to prevent or treat a 13sexually transmitted disease. The applicant may not submit to the department any 14other records than those pertaining to the examination, treatment, procedure, or 15medication for which the applicant is seeking an award.AB821,1216Section 12. 949.26 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB821,5,2017949.26 (1) Except as provided in sub. (1m), the department shall make an 18award under this section to a health care provider who conducts an examination to 19gather evidence regarding a sex offense to reimburse the health care provider only 20for the examination costs, as follows:AB821,6,221(a) If, under sub. (2) (b), the health care provider is not authorized to seek 22payment from insurance or another available source of payment, the award shall be 1the examination costs, regardless of whether the victim, or any guardian of the 2victim, cooperates with a law enforcement agency regarding the sex offense.AB821,6,73(b) If, under sub. (2) (b), the health care provider is authorized to seek 4payment from insurance or another available source of payment and the victim, or 5any guardian of the victim, does not cooperate with a law enforcement agency 6regarding the sex offense, the award shall be the examination costs, reduced by any 7payment to be received as a result of the authorization under sub. (2) (b).AB821,138Section 13. 949.26 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB821,6,129949.26 (3) The department may not refuse to make an award under this 10section because the victim or the guardian of the victim does not cooperate with a 11law enforcement agency regarding the sex offense, or due to lack of an investigation 12or prosecution of the sex offense.AB821,1413Section 14. Jus 11.16 (4) of the administrative code is amended to read:AB821,6,2214Jus 11.16 (4) Maximum amount of award. The department will pay two-15thirds of the amount billed for eligible services, up to a maximum of $1200 $3,000 16for each examination. In exceptional cases, the department in its sole discretion 17may approve an award in excess of the maximum amount if the health care provider 18submits evidence that that maximum amount did not fairly and equitably 19compensate it for the costs incurred in conducting the examination. Beginning 20January 1, 2017 2027, the maximum amount of an award shall be adjusted 21annually by the “inflation factor” as defined in s. 79.05 (1) (am), Stats., and certified 22by the department of revenue under s. 79.05 (2m), Stats.AB821,1523Section 15. Nonstatutory provisions.AB821,7,41(1) Grant administrator. The authorized FTE positions for the department 2of justice are increased by 1.0 GPR positions to be funded from the appropriation 3under s. 20.455 (5) (dm) for the purpose of administering the grant program under 4s. 165.934.AB821,165Section 16. Fiscal changes.AB821,7,146(1) Examination training. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the 7appropriation to the department of justice under s. 20.455 (5) (a), the dollar amount 8for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $100,000 to increase the authorized FTE 9positions for the department by 0.5 GPR positions to train health care providers on 10how to conduct examinations to gather evidence of domestic abuse and 11strangulation. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the 12department of justice under s. 20.455 (5) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-1327 is increased by $100,000 to provide funding for the position authorized under 14this subsection.AB821,1715Section 17. Effective date.AB821,7,1716(1) Notwithstanding s. 227.265, this act takes effect on the day after 17publication.AB821,7,1818